Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8052.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 9-1 of the General Laws entitled "Causes of Action" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
9-1-55. Artificial intelligence -- Liability for injuries.
(a) When used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the following
meanings:
(1) "Artificial intelligence system" means an engineered or machine-based system that
varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, infer from the input
it receives how to generate outputs that can influence physical or virtual environments.
(2) "Developer" means a person that performs the initial training of an artificial intelligence
system either by training a model, or by fine-tuning an existing model.
(3) "Fine-tuning" means adjusting the model weights of a trained covered model or covered
model derivative by exposing it to additional data.
(b) Artificial intelligence; liability for injuries. Except with respect to any causes of action
for defamation, developers shall be liable, regardless of the degree of care they exercised, for all
injuries that satisfy the following conditions:
(1) Those injuries are factually and proximately caused by an artificial intelligence system
that engages in conduct that, if undertaken by an adult human of sound mind, would satisfy the
elements of negligence or any intentional tort or crime; and

(2) That conduct was neither intended nor a consequence of negligence on the part of:
(i) The user of the model; or
(ii) Any intermediary that fine-tuned, scaffolded, or otherwise modified the artificial
intelligence system.
(c)(1) For the purposes of this section, for any torts for which the mental state of the alleged
tortfeasor is relevant to the elements of the tort, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that the
artificial intelligence system satisfies the relevant mental state if the finder of fact determines by a
preponderance of the evidence that, if a natural person under similar circumstances to the artificial
intelligence system took actions similar to those taken by the artificial intelligence system, that
natural person would have acted with the relevant mental state.
(2)(i) Unless the court determines that the presumption established in subsection (c)(1) of
this section is not applicable, if the party against whom the presumption is invoked presents
evidence tending to rebut the presumption established in subsection (c)(1) of this section, the judge
in a jury trial shall instruct the jury to find that the presumed facts exist unless the jury is persuaded
that the presumed facts do not exist.
(ii) Unless the court determines that the presumption established in subsection (c)(1) of this
section is not applicable, if the party against whom the presumption is invoked presents evidence
tending to rebut the presumption established in subsection (c)(1) of this section, the judge in a bench
trial shall find that the presumed facts exist unless the judge is persuaded that the presumed facts
do not exist.
(3) For the purposes of this section, it shall not be a defense that artificial intelligence
systems are incapable of having mental states.
(d)(1) It shall be an absolute defense to liability, including liability under the common law
or existing statutes, if the developer establishes that the covered model or covered model derivative
satisfied the standard of care applicable to humans who perform the same function that the covered
model or covered model derivative was engaged in performing when its conduct allegedly caused
the plaintiff's injury.
(2) It shall be an absolute defense to liability, including liability under the common law or
existing statutes, if the developer establishes that the injuries were a result of a capabilities failure,
in which a covered model or covered model derivative falls short of performing the intended or
reasonably anticipated performance of the user, but the conduct of the system would not satisfy the
elements of negligence or any intentional tort or crime if engaged in by an adult human of sound
mind.
LC005548 - Page 2 of 4

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005548
========
LC005548 - Page 3 of 4